Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 1. In General
§ 11-5-117.
Criminal
provision; penalty; civil penalties; limitations; necessary proof.

Any person violating any provision of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) in addition to fines provided for in W.S. 11-5-109(e).

In any proceeding to impose any fine or penalty for any failure to perform a remedial requirement ordered by a district board for control of a weed or pest in any infested area, the district board shall have the burden of proving:

That the proposed remedial action would control the target weed or pest;

That the remedial action would be a cost effective action and would be more cost effective than any alternative action proposed or adopted by the landowner; and

That the weed or pest to be controlled was at risk of spreading to the land of others in the area.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 30, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-69.20; W.S. 1977, §

11-5-120

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1979, ch. 135, § 2; 2011, ch. 37, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a), substituted “seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00)” for “one hundred dollars ($100.00),” and added (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-5-102(a)(xxiv).

§ 11-5-118.
Inspection for contamination.

Farm products and agricultural,
commercial or industrial equipment entering or moving within the district
are subject to inspection for contamination of designated weeds and
pests by the district board through its designated agents. The board
and the Wyoming weed and pest council may promulgate rules and regulations
which establish inspection standards and remedial requirements under
this section.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 135, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Former §

11-5-118

was redesignated as present §

11-5-119

in 1979.

§ 11-5-119.
Rules and regulations.

The board, with the approval
of a majority of the districts, may promulgate, adopt and publish
rules and regulations in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative
Procedure Act for the purpose of carrying out the intent of this act.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 30, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-69.21; W.S. 1977, § 11-5-121; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

11-5-118

; Laws 1979, ch. 135, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-5-102(a)(xxiv).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi) and notes thereto.

§ 11-5-120.
Wyoming weed and pest council duties.

In addition to other duties prescribed by law, the Wyoming weed and pest council shall aid county weed and pest control districts in creating, managing and enhancing coordinated and comprehensive invasive plant species control programs by:

Developing and implementing data systems to support each district in making invasive plant species management decisions informed by accurate, timely data, local experts, cultural practices and best available science;

Coordinating with the University of Wyoming and community colleges to assess, to the extent practicable, the impacts that invasive plant species can have on socio-ecological systems. As used in this paragraph, “socio-ecological system” means a dynamic system encompassing interactions between people and nature within a defined geographical area;

Coordinating with the University of Wyoming, community colleges and government agencies to support and expand outreach and provide applied research on the best use of existing tools to control invasive plant species and the development of new invasive plant species management methods;

Working with federal partners to reduce barriers to timely, effective invasive plant species management on federal lands and adjoining nonfederal lands;

On a biennial basis, reporting to the joint agriculture, state and public lands and water resources interim committee on the status of current funding models, existing or new funding challenges and opportunities to improve funding for designated or declared invasive plant species;

Encouraging and incentivizing cooperative, landscape-scale projects to control invasive plant species that include multi-jurisdictional partnerships with clear, long-term strategies;

Coordinating with other state and federal agencies to increase public awareness of the challenges presented by invasive plant species and to encourage prevention and mitigation practices.

The Wyoming weed and pest council may, with the approval of the majority of the board, adopt and publish rules in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, W.S.

16-3-101

et seq. to carry out the purposes of this act.

History.

2021 ch. 2, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 2, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.